Nebraska, session 109, LB274.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB274 LB274
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 71-1911.03, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
71-1911.03 (1) An applicant for a license under the Child Care
Licensing Act shall provide to the department written proof of liability
insurance coverage for the hours such applicant is operating and a child
is in the applicant's care of at least two one hundred thousand dollars
per occurrence prior to issuance of the license. A licensee subject to
the Child Care Licensing Act on July 1, 2014, shall obtain such liability
insurance coverage and provide written proof to the department within
thirty days after July 1, 2014.
(2) A licensee shall continue to maintain the required level of
liability insurance for any time period during which a child is in the
care of such licensee. Failure by a licensee to maintain the required
level of liability insurance coverage shall be deemed noncompliance with
the Child Care Licensing Act. If the licensee is the State of Nebraska or
a political subdivision, the licensee may utilize a risk retention group
or a risk management pool for purposes of providing such liability
insurance coverage or may self-insure all or part of such coverage.
Sec. 2. Section 71-1912, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
71-1912 (1) Before issuance of a license, the department shall
investigate or cause an investigation to be made, when it deems
necessary, to determine if the applicant or person in charge of the
program meets or is capable of meeting the physical well-being, safety,
and protection standards and the other rules and regulations of the
department adopted and promulgated under the Child Care Licensing Act.
The department may investigate the character of applicants and licensees,
any member of the applicant's or licensee's household, and the staff and
employees of programs. The department may at any time inspect or cause an
inspection to be made of any place where a program is operating to
determine if such program is being properly conducted.
-2-

LB274 LB274
2025 2025
(2) All inspections by the department shall be unannounced except
for initial licensure visits and consultation visits. Initial licensure
visits are announced visits necessary for a provisional license to be
issued to a family child care home I, family child care home II, child
care center, or school-age-only or preschool program. Consultation visits
are announced visits made at the request of a licensee for the purpose of
consulting with a department specialist on ways of improving the program.
(3) An unannounced inspection of any place where a program is
operating shall be conducted by the department or the city, village, or
county pursuant to subsection (2) of section 71-1914 at least annually
for a program licensed to provide child care for fewer than thirty
children and at least twice every year for a program licensed to provide
child care for thirty or more children. At each unannounced inspection,
the inspector shall request from the licensee, and verify, current proof
of required liability insurance. If the licensee is unable to provide
current proof of liability insurance or has let the required coverage
lapse, the department shall notify the licensee that proof of insurance
shall be provided to the department within three business days. If such
proof of insurance is not provided to the department within three
business days, the licensee's license shall be suspended. Licensure shall
be restored upon the department's receipt and verification of current
proof of the required liability insurance as provided in section
71-1911.03.
(4) Whenever an inspection is made, the findings shall be recorded
in a report designated by the department. The public shall have access to
the results of these inspections upon a written or oral request to the
department. The request must include the name and address of the program.
Additional unannounced inspections shall be performed as often as is
necessary for the efficient and effective enforcement of the Child Care
Licensing Act.
(5)(a) A person applying for a license as a child care provider or a
-3-

LB274 LB274
2025 2025
licensed child care provider under the Child Care Licensing Act shall
submit a request for a national criminal history record information check
for each child care staff member, including a prospective child care
staff member of the child care provider, at the applicant's or licensee's
expense, as set forth in this section.
(b) A prospective child care staff member shall submit to a national
criminal history record information check (i) prior to employment, except
as otherwise permitted under 45 C.F.R. 98.43, as such regulation existed
on January 1, 2019, or (ii) prior to residing in a family child care
home.
(c) The department shall provide documentation of national criminal
history record information checks which proves eligibility for
employment. Such documentation shall be made available to each child care
staff member or prospective child care staff member by the applicant or
licensee for at least one hundred eighty days after the last day of
employment or date the documentation was provided by the department,
whichever is later.
(d) A child care staff member shall be required to undergo a
national criminal history record information check not less than once
during each five-year period. A child care staff member shall submit a
complete set of his or her fingerprints to the Nebraska State Patrol. The
Nebraska State Patrol shall transmit a copy of the child care staff
member's fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a
national criminal history record information check. The national criminal
history record information check shall include information concerning
child care staff members from federal repositories of such information
and repositories of such information in other states, if authorized by
federal law for use by the Nebraska State Patrol. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall issue a report to the department that includes the
information collected from the national criminal history record
information check concerning child care staff members. The department
-4-

LB274 LB274
2025 2025
shall seek federal funds, if available, to assist child care providers
and child care staff members with the costs of the fingerprinting and
national criminal history record information check. If the department
does not receive sufficient federal funds to assist child care providers
and staff members with such costs, then the child care staff member being
screened, applicant for a license, or licensee shall pay the actual cost
of the fingerprinting and national criminal history record information
check, except that the department may pay all or part of the cost if
funding becomes available. The department and the Nebraska State Patrol
may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations concerning the costs
associated with the fingerprinting and the national criminal history
record information check. The department may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations implementing national criminal history record information
check requirements for child care providers and child care staff members.
(e) A child care staff member shall also submit to the following
background checks at his or her expense not less than once during each
five-year period:
(i) A search of the National Crime Information Center's National Sex
Offender Registry; and
(ii) A search of the following registries, repositories, or
databases in the state where the child care provider is located or where
the child care staff member resides and each state where the child care
provider was located or where the child care staff member resided during
the preceding five years:
(A) State criminal registries or repositories;
(B) State sex offender registries or repositories; and
(C) State-based child abuse and neglect registries and databases.
(f) Background checks shall be portable between child care
providers.
(g) Any individual shall be ineligible for employment by a child
care provider if such individual:
-5-

LB274 LB274
2025 2025
(i) Refuses to consent to the national criminal history record
information check or a background check described in this subsection;
(ii) Knowingly makes a materially false statement in connection with
the national criminal history record information check or a background
check described in this subsection;
(iii) Is registered, or required to be registered, on a state sex
offender registry or repository or the National Sex Offender Registry; or
(iv) Has been convicted of a crime of violence, a crime of moral
turpitude, or a crime of dishonesty.
(h) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for purposes of this section.
(i) A child care provider shall be ineligible for a license under
the Child Care Licensing Act and shall be ineligible to participate in
the child care subsidy program if the provider employs a child care staff
member who is ineligible for employment under subdivisions (g) or (h) of
this subsection.
(j) National criminal history record information and information
from background checks described in this subsection subject to state or
federal confidentiality requirements may only be used for purposes of
granting a child care license or approving a child care provider for
participation in the child care subsidy program.
(k) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Child care provider means a child care program required to be
licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act; and
(ii) Child care staff member means an individual who is not related
to all of the children for whom child care services are provided and:
(A) Who is employed by a child care provider for compensation,
including contract employees or self-employed individuals;
(B) Whose activities involve the care or supervision of children for
a child care provider or unsupervised access to children who are cared
for or supervised by a child care provider; or
-6-

LB274 LB274
2025 2025
(C) Who is residing in a family child care home and who is eighteen
years of age or older.
Sec. 3. Section 71-1913, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-1913 (1) The department may request the State Fire Marshal to
inspect any program for fire safety pursuant to section 81-502. The State
Fire Marshal shall immediately notify the department whenever he or she
delegates authority for such inspections under such section.
(2) The department may investigate all facilities and programs of
licensed providers of child care programs as defined in section 71-1910
or applicants for licenses to provide such programs to determine if the
place or places to be covered by such licenses meet standards of
sanitation and physical well-being set by the department for the care and
protection of the child or children who may be placed in such facilities
and programs. The department may delegate this authority to qualified
local environmental health personnel.
(3) At each investigation, the inspector shall request from the
licensee, and verify, current proof of liability insurance pursuant to
section 71-1911.03.
(4) (3) This section does not apply to school-age child care
programs which are licensed pursuant to section 71-1917.
Sec. 4. Original section 71-1913, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 71-1911.03 and 71-1912, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-7-